Tennessee, session 114, SB0928.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-6001(a), is amended by
designating the subsection as subdivision (a)(1) and adding the following as a new subdivision:
(2) The state board of education shall authorize a student who is working toward
completing a career and technical education elective focus to substitute up to four (4)
career and technical education course credits for the required chemistry course credit,
computer science course credit, world language course credit, and Algebra II course
credit necessary to earn a full diploma upon graduation from high school as set forth by
the state board of education pursuant to subdivision (a)(1).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0928
003082
- 1 -